public/dictionaries/nb.aff
SET UTF-8

# This is generated from
# make words.nb; perl -ne 'print join "\n", split //' words.nb | \
# sort | uniq -c | sort -rn | awk '{print $2}' | tr -d "\n"
TRY ensrtialkogdmpuvfbjhøyåæcézSwBHAMKTFxGLNRVEODôèCPJIqUWØÅYüZçäQêöòXëÄ

# These two added by Arno Teigseth 20 oct 2010
# Due to a bug/feature in hunspell they /must/ appear /before/ the COMPOUNDMIN directive.

# Forbids/marks as wrong words that forms triple consonants (trafikk+kork)
CHECKCOMPOUNDTRIPLE
# Makes hunspell suggest to simplify three consonants-> two: trafikk|kork-> trafikkork
SIMPLIFIEDTRIPLE


COMPOUNDFLAG z

COMPOUNDMIN 4


PFX a Y 1
PFX a   0     u           .

PFX b Y 1
PFX b   0     for         .

PFX c Y 1
PFX c   0     gjen        .

PFX d Y 1
PFX d   0     hoved       .

PFX e Y 1
PFX e   0     mis         .

PFX f Y 1
PFX f   0     sam         .

PFX g Y 4
PFX g   0     in          [^blmpr]
PFX g   0     il          l
PFX g   0     im          [bmp]
PFX g   0     ir          r

PFX h Y 1
PFX h   0     etter       .

PFX i Y 1
PFX i   0     til         .

PFX j Y 1
PFX j   0     over        .

PFX k Y 1
PFX k   0     under       .

PFX l Y 1
PFX l   0     på          .

PFX m Y 1
PFX m   0     av          .

PFX n Y 1
PFX n   0     inn         .

PFX o Y 1
PFX o   0     ut          .

PFX p Y 1
PFX p   0     opp         .

PFX q Y 1
PFX q   0     ned         .

PFX r Y 1
PFX r   0     om          .

PFX s Y 1
PFX s   0     sammen      .

SFX t Y 8
SFX t   e     ing         e
SFX t   e     ingen       e
SFX t   e     ingens      e
SFX t   e     inga        e
SFX t   0     ing         [aiouyøå]
SFX t   0     ingen       [aiouyøå]
SFX t   0     ingens      [aiouyøå]
SFX t   0     inga        [aiouyøå]

SFX u N 6
SFX u   0     lig         [^lm]
SFX u   0     lige        [^lm]
SFX u   0     ig          l
SFX u   0     ige         l
SFX u   0     melig       m
SFX u   0     melige      m

SFX v Y 6
SFX v   0     lse         e
SFX v   0     lsen        e
SFX v   0     lsens       e
SFX v   0     else        [ioå]
SFX v   0     elsen       [ioå]
SFX v   0     elsens      [ioå]

SFX w Y 3
SFX w   0     het         .
SFX w   0     heten       .
SFX w   0     hetens      .

SFX x Y 2
SFX x   0     skap        [^e]
SFX x   e     skap        e

SFX y Y 12
SFX y   0     itet        [aeiouyø][dlmnrsv]
SFX y   0     iteten      [aeiouyø][dlmnrsv]
SFX y   0     itetens     [aeiouyø][dlmnrsv]
SFX y   ell   alitet      ell
SFX y   ell   aliteten    ell
SFX y   ell   alitetens   ell
SFX y   ær    aritet      ær
SFX y   ær    ariteten    ær
SFX y   ær    aritetens   ær
SFX y   e     ning        e
SFX y   e     ningen      e
SFX y   e     ningens     e

SFX A Y 24
SFX A   0     n           e
SFX A   0     ns          e
SFX A   é     een         é
SFX A   é     eens        é
SFX A   0     en          [^eém]
SFX A   0     ens         [^eém]
SFX A   0     men         [aø]m
SFX A   0     mens        [aø]m
SFX A   0     men         [^k][lr]em
SFX A   0     mens        [^k][lr]em
SFX A   0     en          krem
SFX A   0     ens         krem
SFX A   0     en          [^lr]em
SFX A   0     ens         [^lr]em
SFX A   0     en          [^aeouø]m
SFX A   0     ens         [^aeouø]m
SFX A   0     men         [bdglv]om
SFX A   0     mens        [bdglv]om
SFX A   0     en          [^bdglv]om
SFX A   0     ens         [^bdglv]om
SFX A   0     men         [skl]um
SFX A   0     mens        [skl]um
SFX A   0     en          [^skl]um
SFX A   0     ens         [^skl]um

SFX B Y 36
SFX B   0     t           e
SFX B   0     ts          e
SFX B   é     eet         é
SFX B   é     eets        é
SFX B   er    ret         [^drt][dt]er
SFX B   er    rets        [^drt][dt]er
SFX B   el    let         [fgkpsv]el
SFX B   el    lets        [fgkpsv]el
SFX B   del   let         ddel
SFX B   del   lets        ddel
SFX B   tel   let         ttel
SFX B   tel   lets        ttel
SFX B   0     et          [^eém]
SFX B   0     ets         [^eém]
SFX B   0     et          [^aeou]m
SFX B   0     ets         [^aeou]m
SFX B   0     met         [^e]am
SFX B   0     mets        [^e]am
SFX B   0     et          eam
SFX B   0     ets         eam
SFX B   0     met         [jv]em
SFX B   0     mets        [jv]em
SFX B   0     et          [^jlv]em
SFX B   0     ets         [^jlv]em
SFX B   0     met         dlem
SFX B   0     mets        dlem
SFX B   0     et          [^d]lem
SFX B   0     ets         [^d]lem
SFX B   0     met         [rk]om
SFX B   0     mets        [rk]om
SFX B   0     et          [^rk]om
SFX B   0     ets         [^rk]om
SFX B   0     et          [^ei]um
SFX B   0     ets         [^ei]um
SFX B   um    et          [ei]um
SFX B   um    ets         [ei]um

SFX C Y 33
SFX C   e     a           e
SFX C   é     ea          é
SFX C   0     a           [^eélmrt]
SFX C   0     a           [^e]t
SFX C   et    a           et
SFX C   0     a           [^e][lr]
SFX C   el    la          [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX C   0     a           jel
SFX C   del   la          ddel
SFX C   0     a           [^d]del
SFX C   fel   la          ffel
SFX C   kel   la          kkel
SFX C   el    la          [^k]kel
SFX C   mel   la          mmel
SFX C   0     a           [^m]mel
SFX C   0     a           nel
SFX C   pel   la          ppel
SFX C   el    la          [^p]pel
SFX C   sel   la          ssel
SFX C   el    la          [^s]sel
SFX C   tel   la          ttel
SFX C   el    la          [^t]tel
SFX C   er    ra          [^fm]er
SFX C   fer   ra          fer
SFX C   mer   ra          mer
SFX C   0     a           [^aeou]m
SFX C   0     ma          am
SFX C   0     ma          jem
SFX C   0     a           [^j]em
SFX C   0     ma          [rv]om
SFX C   0     a           [^rv]om
SFX C   0     a           [^eir]um
SFX C   um    a           [eir]um

SFX D Y 30
SFX D   e     as          e
SFX D   é     eas         é
SFX D   0     as          [^eélmr]
SFX D   0     as          [^e][lr]
SFX D   el    las         [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX D   0     as          jel
SFX D   del   las         ddel
SFX D   0     as          [^d]del
SFX D   fel   las         ffel
SFX D   kel   las         kkel
SFX D   el    las         [^k]kel
SFX D   mel   las         mmel
SFX D   0     as          [^m]mel
SFX D   0     as          nel
SFX D   pel   las         ppel
SFX D   el    las         [^p]pel
SFX D   sel   las         ssel
SFX D   el    las         [^s]sel
SFX D   tel   las         ttel
SFX D   el    las         [^t]tel
SFX D   er    ras         [^fm]er
SFX D   fer   ras         fer
SFX D   mer   ras         mer
SFX D   0     as          [^eou]m
SFX D   0     mas         jem
SFX D   0     as          [^j]em
SFX D   0     mas         [rv]om
SFX D   0     as          [^rv]om
SFX D   0     as          [^ei]um
SFX D   um    as          [ei]um

SFX E Y 36
SFX E   0     r           e
SFX E   é     eer         é
SFX E   0     er          [^eélmr]
SFX E   0     er          [^e][lr]
SFX E   el    ler         [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX E   0     er          jel
SFX E   del   ler         ddel
SFX E   0     er          [^d]del
SFX E   fel   ler         ffel
SFX E   kel   ler         kkel
SFX E   el    ler         [^k]kel
SFX E   mel   ler         mmel
SFX E   0     er          [^m]mel
SFX E   0     er          nel
SFX E   pel   ler         ppel
SFX E   el    ler         [^p]pel
SFX E   sel   ler         ssel
SFX E   el    ler         [^s]sel
SFX E   tel   ler         ttel
SFX E   el    ler         [^t]tel
SFX E   er    re          [^fmk]er
SFX E   fer   re          fer
SFX E   mer   re          mer
SFX E   ker   re          ker
SFX E   0     er          [^aeouø]m
SFX E   0     mer         dlem
SFX E   0     er          blem
SFX E   0     er          [^lr]em
SFX E   0     mer         [^kbd][lr]em
SFX E   0     er          krem
SFX E   0     mer         [aø]m
SFX E   0     mer         [bdgl]om
SFX E   0     er          [^bdgl]om
SFX E   0     er          [^eiks]um
SFX E   0     mer         [ks]um
SFX E   um    er          [ei]um
