public/dictionaries/nb.dic
aktivt/g
apotek/dBCEGHJz
arbeidsdokumentene/f
arbeidsgrunnlag/fBG
arbeidsordning/fACEG
avdelingsformann/dkAJMz
avdelingskontorene/kJ
avgrensningsnemnd/ACDEG
avrigge/CEWt
basstreng/AEG
banna/b
barnevernsutdanne/tv
basisordliste/ACEGH
begrepets/dj
begynnende/l
behandlingens/hj
beholde/EJORSY`y
beinets/b
beita/f
bemannede/ajk
bensinutsalg/BJ
beramminga/r
beskyttede/aj
beskyttelsesanordning/AEG
besteborger/AIux
bestillingens/hm
besverge/CEJMSTYtv
betalingsordninger/nq
betones/j
bisne/CEGJMSTYu
blaffe/BCEGHJMSTYt
blandede/aps
bløtt/pV
bokstavens/b
brakt/ijnpsz
broderer/j
brukbar/aVWXw
bruke/ABCDEFGHJORSYZu
brukens/ceh
brukerfamilie/eAEG
brukets/dek
brukken/mr
bryteres/dmn
brytinga/q
bygginger/qr
børsmedlem/BEGHx
comeback/ABCGz
danningen/erJ
datert/apVVinf
debatteres/o
definerer/r
dekker/ijm
dekninger/ijkmnp
deplasement/BCEG
diktes/c
dimensjoneringen/jkJ
direkte/gz
dirigert/rV
disponibelt/g
dobling/bACEG
dramatiseringen/jmJ
dras/jln
duell/AEGyz
dyssinga/q
dyttingen/lJ
eige/Cy
eksamineringen/oJ
eksistenser/df
ektheter/a
elementets/d
erobres/c
eskortere/EJORSYt
estimer/jkVW
evaluering/hACEGHJz
faktureres/o
fare/ABCEGHJORSYZtxz
fasitbok/ACDM
fatningen/sJ
feltsentralbord/B
festivalåpning/A
fiberplate/CEG
finansieringens/dj
finningen/c
flagging/oACEGz
flaskingen/pJ
flatningen/bJ
flygingen/nJ
flytende/ioz
flyttingene/bijnorR
forakte/ACEGJMSTYtu
forbarme/CEJMSTYtv
fordelingsvirkning/rAEGz
foreløbig/Vw
foreningsarbeid/dBz
forholdet/eCCJ
formålsregel/AEG
formørke/CEJMSTYtvy
forråtne/CEJMSTYuv
forskningskommisjon/hA
forsterkerens/b
forstår/ek
fortalt/cV
freder/a
fullbyrde/CEJWtv
funnenes/f
fôringen/jpqJ
fødinga/c
førstelag/BG\
føye/EJQRSWYuz
gal/ACEGKVWXxz
gis/chkn
givingen/chn
gjenoppføre/EJOtv
gjerding/nACEG
glosebok/ACDM
grodde/cejnqR
grov/CEGKVWXwxz
gruppemedlem/BEGx
gyse/CEGJOOSWYtuy
hallens/d
handlende/er
heimføre/EJORS
hekksaks/ACEG
hengende/hjqsz
hengene/rs
henget/jpr
hengingen/pJ
hindringer/bd
hjulpne/m
holdt/bejms
humane/gR
hyklede/a
håkjerringfiske/B
høn/ACDEGHJKV
høve/CEGHJQQRSWYu
imellom/nz
innkassere/EJOt
innvie/CEJMRSTYtv
internasjonal/AEGKVWyz
jordiskheten/jkJ
jordskjelvobservatoriet/CJ
jubla/i
justeres/pq
kallinga/lnps
kalsiumhydroksid/CEG
kavede/p
kjennelser/ce
kjennende/ce
kjøringa/fjlmnopqr
kjørsel/jlmnopqACEGz
klagd/lV
klarert/aoV
klassifisér/r
kledningens/jl
klok/KVWXwx
klær/bkIz
kløveress/B
knepne/s
knyttet/CJMTw
kobling/mprsACEGHz
kokes/jn
kommen/fn
kommer/fh
kompe/CDEGJMMRSTTY
konferanse/dAEGHz
kongefamilie/AEGJ
kopler/is
krøllete/sR
kvadrere/EJORSYt
kvikker/pV
lagerorganisasjon/AEG
ledende/e
legges/kmqr
legginga/qr
leiringen/m
lempe/CEGJMRSTY`tuy
lesbare/amR
levd/ahV
leveringsfrist/djnAEGz
levningens/hj
logginger/l
lojalt/ag
lukka/ci
lune/CEGHJMOQRSTYyz
luseegget/C
løyst/anpVV
mannen/bdjpinf
marmorutsmykking/bAx
minneplakett/AEG
mistenksom/VWXw
monterer/hlmnp
mortalitet/gEG
motor/dAEGHJz
mykingen/p
måleutstyr/B
målingens/mp
møbleringer/r
mønstrer/lm
nasjonalt/ajinf
navna/afhip
nordiskere/af
nordost/EGu
omgå/JKLSWYv
oppbyggingsarbeid/cz
oppsyn/jBCHz
opptaksnemnd/ACDEG
oppveie/EJQSty
overflytte/CEJMWY_t
pakning/bACEGHz
plantere/gE
polokamp/EG
pond/CG
portforbudene/g
prioritert/ahjkqrV
privilegeres/k
proft/a
pubertet/AEGJ\
ransake/CEJMORSTY_tv
rasjonelle/agRRinf
rasjonellest/agV
raska/s
reaksjon/hjAEFGHJz
redningsmann/AJMx
registres/dk
regulæren/g
rekningen/ep
res/ag
retningsavhengig/w
ride/EJQRSYyz
ringa/gnr
ruskevær/B
rådd/fipV
råde/BCEGHJMQRSTYuz
salgets/ho
segmentert/aV
settingens/ijmqs
sikkerhetsgradere/JOt
sjaskede/i
skrifters/klmn
skriftprosjektør/A
slengeren/hV
slukstang/ACMz
slående/q
slår/ks
slås/ks
smussinga/i
snebro/CDJ
sommeren/bh
spart/anpV
spenstig/VXw
spentheten/j
spillegal/Vx
spist/jmp
spondé/AEG
stakkars/u
strømmingen/in
strømningen/dijkno
strømningens/dijko
står/ckmp
svalepar/BG
synlige/abR
sådd/aijz
søkte/ahmpR
taleteknikk/fA
tilsynskompetanse/A
tirre/CEJMSTYt
trekkingen/s
truffet/l
tvetydig/Vw
tvilsomme/aR
tågebæret/C
utdannelseskurs/hz
utnevne/EJORSYtvz
utskifte/CEJMRSTYZ_`tuy
vassløse/uy
veis/kz
venne/AEFGHJRSWYxz
verbalisme/EG
vettløs/VWw
viltnemnd/ACDEG
vokstre/eEG
